California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
 time the position of administrator, manager, program director, or fiscal officer of a facility is filled and prior to actual employment for initial licensure or an individual who is initially hired on or after January 1, 2003. For purposes of this subdivision, “applicant” and “licensee” include the administrator, manager, program director, or fiscal officer of a facility.

(B) Commencing July 1, 2013, upon the employment of, or contract with or for, any direct care staff, the direct care staff person or licensee shall submit fingerprint images and related information pertaining to the direct care staff person to the Department of Justice for purposes of a criminal record check, as specified in paragraph (2), at the expense of the direct care staff person or licensee. The Department of Justice shall provide the results of the criminal record check to the State Department of Health Care Services. The State Department of Health Care Services shall
 determine whether the direct care staff person has ever been convicted of a crime specified in subdivision (c). The State Department of Health Care Services shall notify the licensee of these results. No direct client contact by the trainee or newly hired staff, or by any direct care contractor shall occur prior to clearance by the State Department of Health Care Services unless the trainee, newly hired employee, contractor, or employee of the contractor is constantly supervised.

(C) Commencing July 1, 2013, any contract for services provided directly to patients or residents shall contain provisions to ensure that the direct services contractor submits to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information pertaining to the direct services contractor for submission to the State Department of Health Care Services for purposes of a criminal record check, as specified in paragraph (2), at the expense of the direct services
 contractor or licensee. The Department of Justice shall provide the results of the criminal record check to the State Department of Health Care Services. The State Department of Health Care Services shall determine whether the direct services contractor has ever been convicted of a crime specified in subdivision (c). The State Department of Health Care Services shall notify the licensee of these results.

(2) If the applicant, licensee, direct care staff person, or direct services contractor specified in paragraph (1) has resided in California for at least the previous seven years, the applicant, licensee, direct care staff person, or direct services contractor shall only submit one set of fingerprint images and related information to the Department of Justice. The Department of Justice shall charge a fee sufficient to cover the reasonable cost of processing the fingerprint submission. Fingerprints and related information submitted pursuant to
 this subdivision include fingerprint images captured and transmitted electronically. When requested, the Department of Justice shall forward one set of fingerprint images to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for the purpose of obtaining any record of previous convictions or arrests pending adjudication of the applicant, licensee, direct care staff person, or direct services contractor. The results of a criminal record check provided by the Department of Justice shall contain every conviction rendered against an applicant, licensee, direct care staff person, or direct services contractor, and every offense for which the applicant, licensee, direct care staff person, or direct services contractor is presently awaiting trial, whether the person is incarcerated or has been released on bail or on their own recognizance pending trial. The State Department of the Health Care Services shall request subsequent arrest notification from the Department of Justice pursuant to Section 11105.2 of the Penal Code.

(3) An applicant and any other person specified in this subdivision, as part of the background clearance process, shall provide information as to whether or not the person has any prior criminal convictions, has had any arrests within the past 12-month period, or has any active arrests, and shall certify that, to the best of their knowledge, the information provided is true. This requirement is not intended to duplicate existing requirements for individuals who are required to submit fingerprint images as part of a criminal background clearance process. Every applicant shall provide information on any prior administrative action taken against them by any federal, state, or local government agency and shall certify that, to the best of their knowledge, the information provided is true. An applicant or other person required to provide information pursuant to this section that knowingly or willfully makes false statements, representations, or
 omissions may be subject to administrative action, including, but not limited to, denial of their application or exemption or revocation of any exemption previously granted.

(c) (1) The State Department of Health Care Services shall deny any application for any license, suspend or revoke any existing license, and disapprove or revoke any employment or contract for direct services, if the applicant, licensee, employee, or direct services contractor has been convicted of, or incarcerated for, a felony defined in subdivision (c) of Section 667.5 of, or subdivision (c) of Section 1192.7 of, the Penal Code, within the preceding 10 years.

(2) The application for licensure or renewal of any license shall be denied, and any employment or contract to provide direct services shall be disapproved or revoked, if the criminal record of the person includes a conviction in
 another jurisdiction for an offense that, if committed or attempted in this state, would have been punishable as one or more of the offenses referred to in paragraph (1).

(d) (1) The State Department of Health Care Services may approve an application for, or renewal of, a license, or continue any employment or contract for direct services, if the person has been convicted of a misdemeanor offense that is not a crime upon the person of another, the nature of which has no bearing upon the duties for which the person will perform as a licensee, direct care staff person, or direct services contractor. In determining whether to approve the application, employment, or contract for direct services, the department shall take into consideration the factors enumerated in paragraph (2).

(2) Notwithstanding subdivision (c), if the criminal record of a person indicates
 any conviction other than a minor traffic violation, the State Department of Health Care Services may deny the application for license or renewal, and may disapprove or revoke any employment or contract for direct services. In determining whether or not to deny the application for licensure or renewal, or to disapprove or revoke any employment or contract for direct services, the department shall take into consideration the following factors:

(A) The nature and seriousness of the offense under consideration and its relationship to the person’s employment, duties, and responsibilities.

(B) Activities since conviction, including employment or participation in therapy or education, that would indicate changed behavior.

(C) The time that has elapsed since the commission of the conduct or offense and the number of
 offenses.

(D) The extent to which the person has complied with any terms of parole, probation, restitution, or any other sanction lawfully imposed against the person.

(E) Any rehabilitation evidence, including character references, submitted by the person.

(F) Employment history and current employer recommendations.

(G) Circumstances surrounding the commission of the offense that would demonstrate the unlikelihood of repetition.

(H) The granting by the Governor of a full and unconditional pardon.

(I) A certificate of rehabilitation from a superior court.

(e) Denial, suspension, or revocation of a license, or disapproval or revocation of any employment or contract for direct services specified in subdivision (c) and paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) are not subject to appeal, except as provided in subdivision (f).

(f) After a review of the record, the director may grant an exemption from denial, suspension, or revocation of any license, or disapproval of any employment or contract for direct services, if the crime for which the person was convicted was a property crime that did not involve injury to any person and the director has substantial and convincing evidence to support a reasonable belief that the person is of such good character as to justify issuance or renewal of the license or approval of the employment or contract.

(g) A plea or verdict of guilty, or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere shall be
 deemed a conviction within the meaning of this section. The State Department of Health Care Services may deny any application, or deny, suspend, or revoke a license, or disapprove or revoke any employment or contract for direct services based on a conviction specified in subdivision (c) when the judgment of conviction is entered or when an order granting probation is made suspending the imposition of sentence.

(h) (1) For purposes of this section, “direct care staff” means any person who is an employee, contractor, or volunteer who has contact with other patients or residents in the provision of services. Administrative and licensed personnel shall be considered direct care staff when directly providing program services to participants.

(2) An additional background check shall not be required pursuant to this section if the direct care staff or licensee has
 received a prior criminal history background check while working in a mental health rehabilitation center, psychiatric residential treatment facility, or psychiatric health facility licensed by the State Department of Health Care Services, and provided the department has maintained continuous subsequent arrest notification on the individual from the Department of Justice since the prior criminal background check was initiated.

(3) When an application is denied on the basis of a conviction pursuant to this section, the State Department of Health Care Services shall provide the individual whose application was denied with notice, in writing, of the specific grounds for the proposed denial.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 589, Sec. 13.   (AB 2317)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6.2. Mental Health Advocacy [5500. - 5550.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [5500. - 5500.]

5500.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Advocacy” means those activities undertaken on behalf of persons who are receiving or have received mental health services to protect their rights or to secure or upgrade treatment or other services to which they are entitled.

(b) “Mental health client” or “client” means a person who is receiving or has received services from a mental health facility, service, or program and who has personally or through a guardian ad litem, entered into an agreement with a county patients’ rights advocate for the provision of advocacy services.

(c) “Mental health facilities, services, or programs” means a
 publicly operated or supported mental health facility or program; a private facility or program licensed or operated for health purposes providing services to persons with mental health disorders; and publicly supported agencies providing other than mental health services to clients with mental health disorders.

(d) “Independent of providers of service” means that the advocate has no direct or indirect clinical or administrative responsibility for any recipient of mental health services in any mental health facility, program, or service for which he or she performs advocacy activities.

(e) “County patients’ rights advocate” means an advocate appointed, or whose services are contracted for, by a local mental health director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 144, Sec. 97.   (AB 1847)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Patients’ Rights Program [5510. - 5514.]

5510.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares as follows:

(1) The State of California accepts its responsibility to ensure and uphold the right of persons with mental disabilities and an obligation, to be executed by the State Department of State Hospitals and the State Department of Health Care Services, to ensure that mental health laws, regulations and policies on the rights of recipients of mental health services are observed and protected in state hospitals and in licensed health and community care facilities.

(2) Persons with mental
 illness are vulnerable to abuse, neglect, and unreasonable and unlawful deprivations of their rights.

(3) Patients’ rights advocacy and investigative services concerning patient abuse and neglect previously provided by the State Department of Mental Health, including the Office of Human Rights and investigator, and state hospitals’ patients’ rights advocates and state hospital investigators and transferred to the State Department of Health Care Services and the State Department of
 State Hospitals, may have had or have conflicts of interest or the appearance of a conflict of interest.

(4) The services provided to patients and their families are of such a special and unique nature that they must be contracted out pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 19130 of the Government Code.

(b) Therefore, to avoid the potential for a conflict of interest or the appearance of a conflict of interest, it is the intent of the Legislature that the patients’ rights advocacy and investigative services described in this
 article be provided by a single contractor specified in Section 5370.2 that meets both of the following criteria:

(1) The contractor can demonstrate the capability to provide statewide advocacy services for persons with mental disabilities.

(2) The contractor has no direct or indirect responsibility for providing services to persons with mental disabilities, except advocacy services.

(c) For the purposes of this article, the Legislature further finds and declares, because of a potential conflict of interest or the appearance of a conflict of interest, that the goals and purposes of the state patients’ rights advocacy and investigative services cannot be accomplished through the utilization of persons selected pursuant to the regular state civil service system. Accordingly, the contracts into which the department
 enters pursuant to this section are permitted and authorized by paragraphs (3) and (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 19130 of the Government Code.

(d) The State Department of State Hospitals and the State Department of Health Care Services shall contract with a single nonprofit entity to provide for the protection and advocacy services to persons with mental
 disabilities, as specified in Section 5370.2. The State Department of Health Care Services and the State Department of State Hospitals shall enter into a memorandum of understanding to ensure the effective management of the contract and the required activities affecting county patients’ rights programs. The entity shall be responsible for ensuring that mental health laws, regulations, and policies on the rights of recipients of mental health services are observed in state hospitals and in licensed health and community care facilities.

(e) The findings and
 declarations of potential conflict of interest provided in this section shall not apply to advocacy services provided under Article 3 (commencing with Section 5520).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 34, Sec. 106.   (SB 1009)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

5511.

The Director of State Hospitals or the executive director of each state hospital may contract with independent persons or agencies to perform patients’ rights advocacy services in state hospitals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 144, Sec. 98.   (AB 1847)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

5512.

Training of county patients’ rights advocates shall be provided by the contractor specified in Section 5510 responsible for the provision of protection and advocacy services to persons with mental disabilities. Training shall be directed at ensuring that all county patients’ rights advocates possess:

(a) Knowledge of the service system, financial entitlements, and service rights of persons receiving mental health services. This knowledge shall include, but need not be limited to, knowledge of available treatment and service resources in order to ensure timely access to treatment and services.

(b) Knowledge of patients’ rights in institutional and community facilities.

(c) Knowledge of civil commitment statutes and procedures.

(d) Knowledge of state and federal laws and regulations affecting recipients of mental health services.

(e) Ability to work effectively and respectfully with service recipients and providers, public administrators, community groups, and the judicial system.

(f) Skill in interviewing and counseling service recipients, including giving information and appropriate referrals.

(g) Ability to investigate and assess complaints and screen for legal problems.

(h) Knowledge of administrative and judicial due process proceedings in order to provide representation at administrative hearings and to assist in judicial hearings when necessary to carry out the intent of Section 5522 regarding cooperation between advocates and legal representatives.

(i) Knowledge of, and commitment to, advocacy ethics and principles.

(j) This section shall become operative on January 1, 1996.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 722, Sec. 29) by Stats. 1995, Ch. 546, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1996.   Section operative January 1, 1996, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

5513.

The patients’ rights program shall serve as a liaison between county patients’ rights advocates and the State Department of Health Care Services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 34, Sec. 107.   (SB 1009)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

5514.

There shall be a five-person Patients’ Rights Committee formed through the California Behavioral Health Planning Council. This committee, supplemented by two ad hoc members appointed by the chairperson of the committee, shall advise the Director of Health Care Services and the Director of State Hospitals regarding department policies and practices that affect patients’ rights. The committee shall also review the advocacy and patients’ rights components of each county mental health plan or performance contract and advise the Director of Health Care Services and the Director of State Hospitals concerning the adequacy of each plan or performance contract in protecting patients’ rights. The ad hoc members of the committee shall be persons with substantial experience
 in establishing and providing independent advocacy services to recipients of mental health services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 511, Sec. 4.   (AB 1688)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. County Advocates [5520. - 5525.]

5520.

Each local mental health director shall appoint, or contract for the services of, one or more county patients’ rights advocates. The duties of these advocates shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(a) To receive and investigate complaints from or concerning recipients of mental health services residing in licensed health or community care facilities regarding abuse, unreasonable denial or punitive withholding of rights guaranteed under the provisions of Division 5 (commencing with Section 5000).

(b) To monitor mental health facilities, services and programs for compliance with statutory and regulatory patients’ rights provisions.

(c) To provide training and education about mental health law and patients’ rights to mental health providers.

(d) To ensure that recipients of mental health services in all licensed health and community care facilities are notified of their rights.

(e) To exchange information and cooperate with the patients’ rights program.

This section does not constitute a change in, but is declarative of the existing law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 34, Sec. 109.   (SB 1009)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

5521.

It is the intent of the Legislature that legal representation regarding changes in client legal status or conditions and other areas covered by statute providing for local public defender or court-appointed attorney representation, shall remain the responsibility of local agencies, in particular the county public defender. County patients’ rights advocates shall not duplicate, replace, or conflict with these existing or mandated local legal representations. This section shall not be construed to prevent maximum cooperation between legal representatives and providers of advocacy services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 841, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

5522.

County patients’ rights advocates may conduct investigations if there is probable cause to believe that the rights of a past or present recipient of mental health services have been, may have been, or may be violated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 841, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

5523.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and without regard to the existence of a guardianship or conservatorship, a recipient of mental health services is presumed competent for the purpose of entering into an agreement with county patients’ rights advocates for the provision of advocacy services unless found by the superior court to be incompetent to enter into an agreement with an advocate and a guardian ad litem is appointed for such purposes.

(b) In conducting investigations in cases in which an advocate has not received a request for advocacy services from a recipient of mental health services or from another person on behalf of a recipient of mental health services, the advocate shall notify the treating professional responsible for the care of any recipient of services whom the advocate wishes to interview, and the facility, service, or program administrator, of his or her intention to conduct such an interview. Whenever the treating professional is reasonably available for consultation, the advocate shall consult with the professional concerning the appropriate time to conduct the interview.

(c) Any agreement with any county patients’ rights advocate entered into by a mental health client shall be made knowingly and voluntarily or by a guardian ad litem. It shall be in a language or modality which the client understands. Any such agreement may, at any time, be revoked by the client or by the guardian ad litem, whoever has entered into the agreement, either in writing or by oral declaration to the advocate.

(d) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit a recipient of mental health services from being represented by public or private legal counsel of his or her choice.

(e) The remedies provided by this chapter shall be in addition to any other remedies which may be available to any person, and the failure to pursue or exhaust the remedies or engage in the procedures provided by this chapter shall not preclude the invocation of any other remedy.

(f) Investigations concerning violations of a past recipients’ rights shall be limited to cases involving discrimination, cases indicating the need for education or training, or cases having a direct bearing on violations of the right of a current recipient. This subdivision is not intended to constrain the routine monitoring for compliance with patients’ rights provisions described in subdivision (b) of Section 5520.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 193, Sec. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

5524.

(a) Subject to subdivision (b), a county shall verify that county patients’ rights advocates review the patients’ rights advocacy training materials provided online as described in paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 5370.2 within 90 days of employment. The county shall keep a record of this verification and send a copy electronically to the Patients’ Rights Committee of the California Behavioral Health Planning Council established pursuant to Section 5514.

(b) A county patients’ rights advocate who has been employed for at least one year on or after January 1, 2019, shall not be required to review the materials described in paragraph (5) of
 subdivision (a) of Section 5370.2.

(c) The requirements of this section do not replace the ongoing training required to be provided by the contractor to county patients’ rights advocates as described in Section 5512.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 237, Sec. 3.   (AB 2316)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

5525.

(a) An employer, or any person acting on behalf of the employer, shall not make, adopt, or enforce any rule, regulation, or policy preventing a county patients’ rights advocate from disclosing information to a government or law enforcement agency, to a person with authority over the county patients’ rights advocate, or to an employee who has authority to investigate, discover, or correct the violation or noncompliance, or from providing information to, or testifying before, any public body conducting an investigation, hearing, or inquiry, if the county patients’ rights advocate has reasonable cause to believe that the information discloses a violation of state or federal statute, or a violation of, or noncompliance with, a local, state, or federal rule or regulation, regardless of whether disclosing the
 information is part of the county patients’ rights advocate’s job duties.

(b) An employer, or any person acting on behalf of the employer, shall not retaliate against a county patients’ rights advocate for disclosing information, or because the employer believes that the county patients’ rights advocate disclosed or may disclose information, to a government or law enforcement agency, to a person with authority over the county patients’ rights advocate, or to an employee who has the authority to investigate, discover, or correct the violation or noncompliance, or for providing information to, or testifying before, any public body conducting an investigation, hearing, or inquiry, if the county patients’ rights advocate has reasonable cause to believe that the information discloses a violation of state or federal statute, or a violation of, or noncompliance with, a local, state, or federal rule or regulation, regardless of whether disclosing the
 information is part of the county patients’ rights advocate’s job duties.

(c) An employer, or any person acting on behalf of the employer, shall not retaliate against a county patients’ rights advocate for refusing to participate in an activity that would result in a violation of state or federal statute, or a violation of or noncompliance with a local, state, or federal rule or regulation.

(d) An employer, or any person acting on behalf of the employer, shall not retaliate against a county patients’ rights advocate for having exercised the county patients’ rights advocate’s rights under subdivision (a), (b), or (c) in any former employment.

(e) This section does not apply to rules, regulations, or policies that implement, or to actions by employers against county patients’ rights advocates who violate, the
 confidentiality of the lawyer-client privilege of Article 3 (commencing with Section 950) of, or the physician-patient privilege of Article 6 (commencing with Section 990) of, Chapter 4 of Division 8 of the Evidence Code, or trade secret information.

(f) An employer, or a person acting on behalf of the employer, shall not retaliate against a county patients’ rights advocate because the county patients’ rights advocate is a family member of a person who has, or is perceived to have, engaged in any acts protected by this section.

(g) The rights and protections afforded under this section shall be enforceable by a private right of action and a violation of this section shall not result in an administrative investigation by the Department of Industrial Relations or result in administrative proceedings by that department.

(h) Nothing in this section shall be construed to interfere with protections already granted to a county patients’ rights advocate who is a government employee under Section 1102.5 of the Labor Code.

(i) As used in this section, “employer” includes the local contracting agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 423, Sec. 1.   (AB 333)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Access to Clients [5530. - 5530.]

5530.

(a) County patients’ rights advocates shall have access to all clients and other recipients of mental health services in any mental health facility, program, or service at all times as are necessary to investigate or resolve specific complaints and in accord with subdivision (b) of Section 5523. County patients’ rights advocates shall have access to mental health facilities, programs, and services, and recipients of services therein during normal working hours and visiting hours for other advocacy purposes. Advocates may appeal any denial of access directly to the head of any facility, the director of a county mental health program, or the State Department of
 Health
 Care Services, or may seek appropriate relief in the courts. If a petition to a court sets forth prima facie evidence for relief, a hearing on the merits of the petition shall be held within two judicial days of the filing of the petition. The superior court for the county in which the facility is located shall have jurisdiction to review petitions filed pursuant to this chapter.

(b) County patients’ rights advocates shall have the right to interview all persons providing the client with diagnostic or treatment services.

(c) Upon request, all mental health facilities shall, when available, provide reasonable space for county patients’ rights advocates to interview clients in privacy and shall make appropriate staff persons available for interview with the advocates in connection with pending matters.

(d) Individual patients shall have a right to privacy which shall include the right to terminate any visit by persons who have access pursuant to this chapter and the right to refuse to see any patient advocate.

(e) Notice of the availability of advocacy services and information about patients’ rights may be provided by county patients’ rights advocates by means of distribution of educational materials and discussions in groups and with individual patients.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 34, Sec. 110.   (SB 1009)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Access to Records [5540. - 5546.]

5540.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter or in other provisions of law, information about and records of recipients of mental health services shall be confidential in accordance with the provisions of Section 5328.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 841, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

5541.

(a) A specific authorization by the client or by the guardian ad litem is necessary for a county patients’ rights advocate to have access to, copy or otherwise use confidential records or information pertaining to the client. Such an authorization shall be given knowingly and voluntarily by a client or guardian ad litem and shall be in writing or be reduced to writing. The client or the guardian ad litem, whoever has entered into the agreement, may revoke such authorization at any time, either in writing or by oral declaration to the advocate. 

(b) When specifically authorized by the client or the guardian ad litem, the county patients’ rights advocate may inspect and copy confidential client information and records.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 841, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

5542.

County patients’ rights advocates shall have the right to inspect or copy, or both, any records or other materials not subject to confidentiality under Section 5328 or other provisions of law in the possession of any mental health program, services, or facilities, or city, county or state agencies relating to an investigation on behalf of a client or which indicate compliance or lack of compliance with laws and regulations governing patients’ rights, including, but not limited to, reports on the use of restraints or seclusion, and autopsy reports.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 841, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

5543.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, with the authorization of the client, a county patients’ rights advocate may, to the extent necessary for effective advocacy, communicate to the client information contained in client records. The facility program, or agency, shall be allowed to remove from the records any information provided in confidence by members of a client’s family.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 841, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

5544.

Any written client information obtained by county patients’ rights advocates may be used and disseminated in court or administrative proceedings, and to any public agencies, or authorized officials thereof, to the extent required in the providing of advocacy services defined in this chapter, and to the extent that authority to so disclose is obtained from the advocate’s clients.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 841, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

5545.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to limit access to recipients of mental health services in any mental health facility, program, or service or to information or records of recipients of mental health services for the purposes of subdivision (b) of Section 5520 or when otherwise authorized by law to county patients’ rights advocates or other individuals who are not county patients’ rights advocates.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 841, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

5546.

The actual cost of copying any records or other materials authorized under this chapter, plus any additional reasonable clerical costs, incurred in locating and making the records and materials available, shall be borne by the advocate. The additional clerical costs shall be based on a computation of the time spent locating and making the records available multiplied by the employee’s hourly wage.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 841, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Penalties [5550. - 5550.]

5550.

(a) Any person participating in filing a complaint or providing information pursuant to this chapter or participating in a judicial proceeding resulting therefrom shall be presumed to be acting in good faith and unless the presumption is rebutted shall be immune from any liability, civil or criminal, and shall be immune from any penalty, sanction, or restriction that otherwise might be incurred or imposed.

(b) A person shall not knowingly obstruct any county patients’ rights advocate in the performance of duties as described in this chapter, including, but not limited to, access to clients or potential clients, or to their records, whether financial,
 medical, or otherwise, or to other information, materials, or records, or otherwise violate this chapter.

(c) A facility to which the provisions of Section 5325 are applicable shall not discriminate or retaliate in any manner against a patient or employee on the basis that the patient or employee has initiated or participated in any proceeding specified in this chapter. Any attempt by a facility to expel a patient, or any discriminatory treatment of a patient, who, or upon whose behalf, a complaint has been submitted to a county patients’ rights advocate within 120 days of the filing of the complaint shall raise a rebuttable presumption that the action was taken by the facility in retaliation for the filing of the complaint.

(d) A county patients’ rights advocate shall not
 knowingly violate this chapter concerning client privacy and the confidentiality of personally identifiable information.

(e) Any person or facility found in violation of subdivision (b) or (d) shall pay a civil penalty, as determined by a court, of not less than one hundred dollars ($100), or more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), which shall be deposited in the county general funds.

(f) A county patients’ rights advocate who performs this role as an independent contractor or employee of a contracted organization shall have the protection provided pursuant to Section 5525.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 423, Sec. 2.   (AB 333)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 1.5. CHILDREN'S CIVIL COMMITMENT AND MENTAL HEALTH TREATMENT ACT OF 1988 [5585. - 5585.59.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [5585. - 5585.25.]

5585.

This part shall be known as the Children’s Civil Commitment and Mental Health Treatment Act of 1988.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1202, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5585.10.

This part shall be construed to promote the legislative intent and purposes of this part as follows:

(a) To provide prompt evaluation and treatment of minors with a mental health disorder, with particular priority given to a child or adolescent with serious emotional disturbance.

(b) To safeguard the rights to due process for minors and their families through judicial review.

(c) To provide individualized treatment, supervision, and placement services for minors with a grave disability.

(d) To prevent severe and
 long-term mental disabilities among minors through early identification, effective family service interventions, and public education.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 948, Sec. 19.   (AB 2119)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5585.20.

This part shall apply only to the initial 72 hours of mental health evaluation and treatment provided to a minor. Notwithstanding the provisions of the Lanterman-Petris-Short Act (Part 1 (commencing with Section 5000)), unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions and procedures contained in this part shall, for the initial 72 hours of evaluation and treatment, govern the construction of state law governing the civil commitment of minors for involuntary treatment. To the extent that this part conflicts with any other law, it is the intent of the Legislature that this part shall apply. Evaluation and treatment of a minor beyond the initial 72 hours shall be pursuant to the Lanterman-Petris-Short Act (Part 1 (commencing
 with Section 5000)).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 960, Sec. 7.   (AB 2275)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

5585.21.

The Director of Health Care Services may promulgate regulations as necessary to implement and clarify the provisions of this part as they relate to minors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 23, Sec. 40.   (AB 82)   Effective June 27, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

5585.22.
